District of Columbia statutes.
47-2421

Criminal penalties.

Any person who commits any of the acts prohibited by § 47-2419, either knowingly or having reason to know he is doing so, or who fails to comply with any of the requirements of § 47-2420, shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisoned for not more than 3 years, or both.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-225, § 2(c), 48 DCR 35
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 16(c)(2), 48 DCR 1873
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(i)(3), 52 DCR 2638
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(o), 60 DCR 2064

History

D.C. Law 13-313 inserted the section symbol in the section heading.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned for not more than 3 years, or both” for “subject to the penalties under § 47-2414(a)”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $5,000”.

Effect of Amendments

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Editor's Notes